District of Columbia statutes.
22-4516

Severability.

If any part of this chapter is for any reason declared void, such invalidity shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter.

July 8, 1932, 47 Stat. 654, ch. 465, § 16
1981 Ed., § 22-3216.
1973 Ed., § 22-3216.